Connecticut, session 2026, SB00118.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (NEW) (Effective October 1, 2026) (a) As used in this section:
(1) "Baby food product" (A) means any food that is (i) manufactured,
packaged, labeled and sold in a container, and (ii) intended for
consumption by individuals younger than two years of age, and (B)
does not include infant formula, as defined in section 21a-92 of the
general statutes;
(2) "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection;
(3) "Consumer" means an individual residing in this state who is a
purchaser, or a prospective purchaser, of a baby food product;
(4) "Food" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-92 of the
general statutes;
(5) "Person" has the same meaning as provided in section 21a-92 of
the general statutes;
(6) "Production aggregate" means a quantity of a baby food product
LCO 1 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 118
that is (A) intended to be uniform in composition, character and quality,
and (B) produced according to a master manufacturing order;
(7) "Proficient laboratory" means a laboratory that (A) is accredited
under International Organization for Standardization or International
Electrotechnical Commission (ISO/IEC) Standard 17025:2017, as
amended from time to time, (B) uses an analytical method that is as
sensitive as the analytical method described in the latest edition of the
federal Food and Drug Administration's "Elemental Analysis Manual
for Food and Related Products", and (C) demonstrates proficiency in
quantifying each toxic heavy metal concentration to at least six
micrograms of the toxic heavy metal to kilogram of food through an
independent proficiency test by achieving a z-score that is less than or
equal to plus or minus two;
(8) "Quick response code" means a two-dimensional matrix barcode
that consists of blocks arranged in a grid and may be read by an imaging
device;
(9) "Representative sample" means a sample that (A) consists of
several units drawn from a material based on rational criteria, including,
but not limited to, random sampling, and (B) is intended to accurately
represent the material from which the sample is drawn; and
(10) "Toxic heavy metal" includes arsenic, cadmium, lead and
mercury.
(b) On and after January 1, 2027, no person shall manufacture, sell,
distribute or offer for sale in this state any baby food product that
contains a toxic heavy metal in an amount that exceeds the applicable
limit established by the federal Food and Drug Administration.
(c) On and after January 1, 2027, the manufacturer of a baby food
product manufactured in this state, or intended for sale or distribution
in this state, shall, not less frequently than monthly, ensure that a
proficient laboratory tests a representative sample of each production
aggregate of the final baby food product for the presence of toxic heavy
LCO 2 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 118
metals. Each test may be performed before the final baby food product
is packaged for distribution or sale. The manufacturer shall maintain a
record of the results of each such test for not less than thirty-six months
beginning on the date on which such test was performed.
(d) On and after January 1, 2027, the manufacturer of a baby food
product manufactured in this state, or intended for sale or distribution
in this state, shall make publicly available on the manufacturer's Internet
web site, until thirty days after expiration of the shelf life of the final
baby food product:
(1) The name and amount of each toxic heavy metal present in the
final baby food product, as determined by way of the testing required
under subsection (c) of this section;
(2) Information, including, but not limited to, the name of the final
baby food product or the universal product code, lot number or batch
number assigned to the final baby food product, that is sufficient to
enable a reasonable consumer to identify the final baby food product;
and
(3) A link to a publicly accessible web page on the federal Food and
Drug Administration's Internet web site where a consumer may review
current information, and said administration's current guidance,
regarding the effects of toxic heavy metals on children's health.
(e) On and after January 1, 2027, if a baby food product is tested for a
toxic heavy metal subject to an action level, regulatory limit or tolerance
established by the federal Food and Drug Administration under 21 CFR
109, as amended from time to time, the manufacturer of the baby food
product shall display on the baby food product container:
(1) The following statement in a clear, legible and conspicuous
manner:
"For Information About Toxic Element Testing On This Product, Scan
the QR Code."; and
LCO 3 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 118
(2) A quick response code, or another machine-readable code, that
directs consumers to a publicly accessible web page on the
manufacturer's Internet web site, or to the baby food product
information page, disclosing:
(A) The results of the testing described in this subsection; and
(B) The address of a publicly accessible web page on the federal Food
and Drug Administration's Internet web site where a consumer may
review current information, and said administration's current guidance,
regarding the effects of toxic heavy metals on children's health.
(f) On and after January 1, 2027, if a consumer believes, based on the
information provided to the consumer concerning a baby food product,
that the baby food product is being sold in the state in violation of any
provision of subsections (b) to (e), inclusive, of this section, the
consumer may report such belief to the Commissioner of Consumer
Protection in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. After
receiving such report, the commissioner may send a notice to the
manufacturer of such baby food product, in a form and manner
prescribed by the commissioner, requiring such manufacturer to
disclose to the commissioner the results of the testing most recently
performed on such baby food product pursuant to subsection (c) of this
section. The manufacturer shall disclose such results to the
commissioner, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner,
not later than sixty days after the manufacturer receives such notice.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 October 1, 2026 New section
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Subsecs. (b) to (f), inclusive, "Beginning on" was changed to "On and
after" for consistency with standard drafting conventions; and in
Subsec. (c), provisions were redrafted for internal consistency.
LCO 4 of 5

Substitute Bill No. 118
GL Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 5 of 5